District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.19

Common law unaffected.

The remedies under this subchapter do not supplant rights and remedies that may be available against property owners and other liable parties under the common law.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 20, 56 DCR 1596